Utah statutes.
39-7-112.   Dependent benefits.

Dependents of a service member in military service are entitled to the benefits accorded to service members in military service under the provisions of Sections 39-7-113 through 39-7-117 upon application to a court, unless, in the opinion of the court, the ability of the dependents to comply with the terms of the obligation, contract, lease, or bailment has not been materially impaired by reason of the military service of the service member upon whom the applicants are dependent.

